Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1 General Provisions
13-20-113. Rentals and tenant selection.

In the operation or management of housing projects, an authority shall at all times observe the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection:

It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations therein only to persons of low income;

It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations therein only at rentals within the financial reach of such persons of low income;

It may rent or lease to a tenant dwelling accommodations consisting of the number of rooms, but no greater number, which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof, without overcrowding; and

It shall not accept any person as a tenant in any housing project if the person or persons who would occupy the dwelling accommodations have an annual net income in excess of five (5) times the annual rental of the quarters to be furnished such person or persons, except that in the case of families with three (3) or more minor dependents, such ratio shall not exceed six (6) to one (1). In computing the rental for this purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost, as determined by the authority, to the occupants, of heat, water, electricity, gas, cooking range and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority to:

Vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to take possession of a housing project or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, free from all the restrictions imposed by the law, with respect to rentals, tenant selection, manner of operation, or otherwise; or

Pursuant to § 13-20-604, vest in obligees the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to acquire title to a housing project or the property mortgaged by the housing authority, free from all the restrictions imposed by this chapter, except those imposed by §§ 13-20-604 and 13-20-609.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 32, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 234, § 5; 1939, ch. 74, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.25 (Williams, § 3647.29b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-812.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-114. Continuing counseling and education programs for tenants of housing projects.

In the operation and management of housing projects, an authority may assist in the establishment and development of a continuing program of counseling and education for its tenants on household management, self-help, budgeting and money management, consumer education and related counseling and educational services which will assist its tenants in improving their living conditions and ability to purchase a home.

Such program may include a credit union for the tenants.

Such programs should be developed and scheduled to encourage maximum participation of the tenants.

Acts 1972, ch. 668, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-832.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-115. Reasons for eviction.

Local housing authorities shall furnish an evicted tenant with the reasons for such tenant's eviction from a housing project upon the request of the evicted tenant.

Acts 1973, ch. 153, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-834.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-116. Housing or domiciliary care for aged persons — Daily contact and care for tenants.

Any agency of the state or any county, city, metropolitan government or other political subdivision of the state, including, but not limited to, any public housing authority or housing development agency, which operates any program providing housing or domiciliary care for aged persons which, as used herein, means persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older, in buildings which exceed three (3) stories in height, shall, as a part of such operation or program, make arrangements, where funds are made available to it for that purpose, to provide some person or persons each day to contact individually by telephone, in person or in any other effective manner, each aged person in residence, to check upon each aged person's physical well-being and comfort and, in the event and only in the event, such person requests and is in apparent need of medical or social assistance or care, to promptly contact appropriate agencies and request such assistance and care in behalf of any such person. Where public funds are not made available specifically to defray any increased costs caused by such arrangements, the agency shall not be required to provide the arrangements or program out of its funds budgeted for other purposes, but shall nevertheless adopt and implement a program to organize, develop and utilize private individual and organizational resources or any other public agency resources which may be available to carry out the arrangements, either on a volunteer basis or on any other basis which such agency may find to be reasonably feasible within its budgetary or other resources or from funds or resources made available to it from any lawful source, public or private.

Acts 1974, ch. 692, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-835.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-117. Authority membership in metropolitan cities and counties.

In any city or county with a metropolitan form of government, the membership of the housing authority shall be increased by two (2) additional members, which additional members shall be residents of low-rent public housing or housing projects.

One (1) of the commissioners authorized pursuant to § 13-20-408 of any housing authority in any county having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be a resident of low-rent public housing or a housing project to be appointed by the mayor of the municipality creating such authority for a term of two (2) years, notwithstanding § 13-20-408. The first resident appointment shall be made to fill the first expired term of a commissioner occurring after March 17, 1988.

Acts 1983, ch. 49, § 1; 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-118. Immunity of officials.

The individual commissioners, directors, supervisory employees, and supervisory agents of a housing authority, whether such housing authority is formed under this chapter or by private act, while acting in the scope of their authority, including those entities that a housing authority or entity affiliated with an authority may form, incorporate, or join as a partner or member to develop or manage a mixed-finance project, and the directors, supervisory employees, and supervisory agents of such entities, while acting in the scope of their authority for the development or management of the mixed-finance project, enjoy the same protections and immunities that are presently provided for housing authority corporations under the law of this state, and any protections and immunities that may be provided to housing authorities in the future under the law of this state.

Acts 1984, ch. 747, § 1; 2018, ch. 664, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).